Maryland, session 2026, SB0002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–504.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0002*

SENATE BILL 2
(2) (I) “BONUS” MEANS A FORM OF DIRECT OR INDIRECT
PAYMENT, CONSIDERATION, OR COMPENSATION THAT IS PAID OR CONVEYED TO AN
EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY IN ADDITION TO THE EMPLOYEE’S BASE
PAY.
(II) “BONUS” INCLUDES:
1. COMPENSATION THAT THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY DOES NOT FORMALLY LABEL AS A BONUS PAYMENT;
2. ANY FORM OF INCENTIVE COMPENSATION THE FACT
AND AMOUNT OF WHICH IS UNDER THE DISCRETION OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE
COMPANY UNTIL A TIME CLOSE TO THE END OF THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE
INCENTIVE PAYMENT IS PAID; AND
3. PAYMENTS GIVEN IN ADDITION TO BASE PAY THAT
ARE CONTINGENT ON THE OCCURRENCE OF ONE OR MORE EVENTS OR CONDITIONS.
(3) (I) “COMPENSATION” MEANS A FORM OF PAYMENT OR
CONSIDERATION CONVEYED TO OR FOR THE BENEFIT OF A SUPERVISOR IN
CONNECTION WITH THE SUPERVISOR’S WORK FOR A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY.
(II) “COMPENSATION” INCLUDES:
1. DIRECT AND INDIRECT METHODS OF CONFERRING
BENEFITS;
2. CASH AND NONCASH BENEFITS;
3. SALARY, BONUSES, PERIOD PAYMENTS, AND
SEVERANCE PAY; AND
4. THE VALUE OF A PERQUISITE, COMPENSATORY OR
PAID LEAVE, OR OTHER BENEFIT NOT EXCLUDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) “COMPENSATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY EXPENDITURE
OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY FOR HEALTH, MEDICAL, OR LIFE INSURANCE OR
DISABILITY PAY.
(4) “SUPERVISOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) USING THE INDIVIDUAL’S INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT:

SENATE BILL 2 3
1. IS AUTHORIZED BY THE INDIVIDUAL’S EMPLOYER TO
HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE, DISCHARGE, ASSIGN,
REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE OTHER EMPLOYEES;
2. IS RESPONSIBLE FOR DIRECTING THE WORK
PERFORMANCE OF OTHER EMPLOYEES; AND
3. IS RESPONSIBLE FOR RESPONDING TO EMPLOYEE
COMPLAINTS; OR
(II) IS EMPLOYED IN A BONA FIDE EXECUTIVE CAPACITY UNDER
THE FEDERAL FAIR LABOR STANDARDS ACT.
[(a)] (B) This section applies only to a public service company that is an
investor–owned electric company, gas company, or combination gas and electric company.
[(b)] (C) A public service company may not recover through rates any costs
associated with:
(1) membership, dues, sponsorships, or contributions to an industry trade
association, group, or related entity exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(6) of the Internal
Revenue Code; [or]
(2) the acquisition, use, or allocation of costs associated with a private
plane that is owned or leased by the public service company or its holding company;
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION,
PAYING A BONUS TO AN EMPLOYEE OF A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY; OR
(4) COMPENSATION FOR A SUPERVISOR THAT EXCEEDS 110% OF THE
MAXIMUM ANNUAL SALARY PAYABLE TO A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION FOR THE
SAME CALENDAR YEAR.
(D) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY MAY RECOVER THE COSTS ASSOCIATED
WITH PAYING AN EMPLOYEE A BONUS THROUGH RATES IF:
(1) THE EMPLOYEE HAS A WRITTEN EMPLOYMENT CONTRACT THAT
WAS EXECUTED ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2025; OR
(2) THE EMPLOYEE IS COVERED BY A VALID COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING AGREEMENT.

SENATE BILL 2
(E) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF EACH PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY SHALL
ADOPT A COMPANY–WIDE POLICY PLACING REASONABLE COST LIMITATIONS ON
EXPENDITURES FOR:
(1) ENTERTAINMENT AND EVENTS;
(2) OFFICE AND FACILITY RENOVATIONS;
(3) TRANSPORTATION SERVICES, INCLUDING AVIATION;
(4) STAFF DEVELOPMENT ACTIVITIES OR EVENTS;
(5) PERFORMANCE INCENTIVES; AND
(6) OTHER ACTIVITIES OUTSIDE OF THE SCOPE OF THE NORMAL
COURSE OF BUSINESS OPERATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.